Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-216
Game and Parks Commission; Long Bridge State Special Use Area; convey to county of Merrick; reverter.

The Game and Parks Commission is authorized and directed to convey to the county of Merrick for public park purposes the following described real estate now known as Long Bridge State Special Use Area, situated in the county of Merrick, in the State of Nebraska, to wit: A part of the east one thousand eight hundred thirty-nine and forty-two hundredths feet of fractional section 30 in township 12 north, range 7 west of the sixth principal meridian, described as follows: Beginning at the northeast corner of said section 30, thence south forty-four degrees fifty minutes west one hundred seventy-seven and nine-tenths feet, thence south twenty-five degrees thirty-three minutes west one hundred sixty-nine and five-tenths feet, thence thirty-two degrees twenty minutes west one hundred ninety-three and zero-tenths feet, thence south forty-two degrees six minutes west one hundred ninety-three and three-tenths feet, thence south thirty-two degrees thirty-two minutes west three hundred eighteen and two-tenths feet, thence south fifty-nine degrees nine minutes west four hundred fifty-eight and five-tenths feet, thence south thirty-two degrees twelve minutes west five hundred forty-three and zero-tenths feet, thence south forty degrees thirty-eight minutes west two hundred eleven and three-tenths feet, thence south fifty-one degrees zero minutes west three hundred eleven and zero-tenths feet, thence south forty degrees twenty-one minutes west two hundred sixty-nine and five-tenths feet to the west line of said tract, thence south one thousand one hundred ninety feet to the original south bank of Grand Island according to the original government survey, thence northeasterly along said original south bank of Grand Island according to the original government survey to the location of the original meander corner on the east line of said section 30, thence north one hundred twenty-one and four-tenths feet to the place of beginning, together with all accretion land in connection therewith and pertaining thereto, containing one hundred forty-six acres, more or less; Provided, that should the county of Merrick cease to operate the lands conveyed as a public park and recreation area, title to said lands shall revert to the Game and Parks Commission.

Laws 1973, LB 163, § 4;

C.S.Supp.,1974, § 81-815.49.